Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.02
Abatement or abatement project, defined.

Abatement or abatement project means any measure or set of measures designed to permanently eliminate lead-based paint hazards. Abatement includes, but is not limited to:

(1) The removal of lead-based paint and lead-contaminated dust, the permanent enclosure or encapsulation of lead-based paint, the replacement of lead-painted surfaces or fixtures, and the removal or covering of lead-contaminated soil;

(2) All preparation, cleanup, disposal, and post-abatement clearance testing activities associated with such measures; and

(3)(a) Projects for which there is a written contract or other documentation which provides that a firm or an individual will be conducting activities in or to a residential dwelling or child-occupied facility that (i) will result in the permanent elimination of lead-based paint hazards or (ii) are designed to permanently eliminate lead-based paint hazards and are described in subdivision (1) or (2) of this section;

(b) Projects resulting in the permanent elimination of lead-based paint hazards conducted by firms or individuals licensed in accordance with the Residential Lead-Based Paint Professions Practice Act unless such projects are excluded from the definition of abatement or abatement project under this section;

(c) Projects resulting in the permanent elimination of lead-based paint hazards conducted by firms or individuals who or which, through company name or promotional literature, hold themselves out to be in the business of performing lead-based paint activities unless such projects are excluded from the definition of abatement or abatement project under this section; or

(d) Projects resulting in the permanent elimination of lead-based paint hazards that are conducted in response to state or local abatement orders.

Abatement does not include renovation, remodeling, landscaping, or other activities when such activities are not designed to permanently eliminate lead-based paint hazards but instead are designed to repair, restore, or remodel a structure or dwelling even if such activities may incidentally result in a reduction or elimination of lead-based paint hazards. Abatement does not include interim controls, operations, and maintenance activities or other measures and activities designed to temporarily but not permanently reduce lead-based paint hazards.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1263.